Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3403
Applicability.

The Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer
on Death Act applies to a transfer on death deed made before, on, or after
January 1, 2013, by a transferor dying on or after January 1, 2013. A transfer
on death deed is subject to the common-law principles of equity except to
the extent modified by the Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer on Death
Act.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 3.